District of Columbia statutes.
3-1105

Operational space and personnel; agency cooperation.

The Mayor shall provide sufficient space for the Commission to operate and may detail personnel to assist the Commission in its work. The Mayor shall also direct all agencies contacted by the Commission to give their full cooperation.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-183, § 6, 32 DCR 841
1981 Ed., § 2-3105.